Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-226
Cause of action against a common carrier; limitation.

A cause of action for a freight damage claim, a rate overcharge, a claim for damages resulting from a delay in transportation, or a claim for a lost shipment against a common carrier shall be barred unless it is filed with a court having jurisdiction of the amount in dispute within two years after the date such action accrues. A cause of action for a rate overcharge accrues on the date the overcharge is paid. A cause of action for a freight damage claim, damages resulting from a delay in transportation, or a shortage in a shipment accrues on the date of delivery or tender of delivery of the freight by the common carrier. A cause of action for a lost shipment accrues on the date the lost shipment was delivered to the common carrier.

Laws 1967, c. 479, § 20, p. 1485;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 75-802;

Laws 1991, LB 14, § 1.